Maryland, session 2026, HB0810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Blockchain” means a distributed ledger technology that provides a
secure, immutable, and transparent method of recording and storing data.
(3) “Digital title” means a cryptographically secured token or smart
contract that represents ownership of real property in the State.
(4) “Pilot jurisdictions” means not more than three counties in the State
selected by the State Department of Assessments and Taxation to implement the Pilot
Program.
(5) “Pilot Program” means the Blockchain–Based Real Property Title Pilot
Program.
(6) (3) “Squatting” means the unauthorized occupation of real property by an
individual who does not have legal title, a lease, or the right of possession.
(b) (1) There is a Blockchain–Based Real Property Title Pilot Program in the
The State Department of Assessments and Taxation, in coordination with the Maryland
Judiciary, the Maryland State Police, local law enforcement agencies, the Office of the
Attorney General, Maryland Legal Aid, the Public Justice Center, the Maryland Blockchain
Association, and third–party technology vendors, shall conduct a study to evaluate the use
of blockchain–based real property lease and title recordation and verification.
– 1 –

Ch. 747 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (c) The purpose of the Pilot Program is to study shall:
(i) (1) explore evaluate the use of blockchain technology for
securely recording and verifying real property ownership and leases; and
(ii) (2) assess the potential for the use of blockchain technology to
assist law enforcement and courts in resolving real property disputes involving squatting.
(c) (1) The State Department of Assessments and Taxation shall administer
the Pilot Program.
(2) The Pilot Program shall begin on or before January 1, 2027.
(d) The State Department of Assessments and Taxation shall coordinate with the
Maryland Judiciary, the Maryland State Police, local law enforcement agencies, and the
Office of the Attorney General to:
(1) create a blockchain registry to record and verify digital titles;
(2) authorize property owners in pilot jurisdictions to opt in to having their
property titles mirrored on the blockchain as digital titles;
(3) provide a secure application programming interface for law
enforcement and courts to validate the status of digital titles in real time;
(4) test smart contract capabilities for title transfers and escrow functions;
and
(5) educate consumers, law enforcement, and courts on how to use the
blockchain registry.
(e) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the State
Department of Assessments and Taxation may contract with third–party technology
vendors to create the blockchain registry required under subsection (d) of this section.
(2) If the State Department of Assessments and Taxation contracts with a
technology vendor under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Department shall use a
competitive procurement process in accordance with Division II of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(3) A technology vendor under this subsection shall:
(i) comply with cybersecurity standards; and
(ii) ensure data privacy and interoperability with existing State
systems.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 747
(f) (d) On or before December 31, 2028 2026, the State Department of Assessments
and Taxation, in coordination with the Maryland Judiciary, the Maryland State Police,
local law enforcement agencies, and the Office of the Attorney General, Maryland Legal
Aid, the Public Justice Center, the Maryland Blockchain Association, and third–party
technology vendors, shall report the results of the Pilot Program and recommendations for
statewide adoption study to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October June 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 9 months and, at
the end of June 30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –